hw02/serbian.foma
# Vowels
define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | u ];

# Consonants 
define Consonant [ b | v | g | d | đ | ž | z | j | k | l | lj | m | n | nj | p | r | s | t | ć | f | h | c | č | dž | š];

################################################################
# Palatalization
# Velar -> 
# Examples:
#   - vojnik `soldier` (N+Nom+Sg)   ->    vojniče  (N+Voc+Sg)
#   - vući   `to pull` (V+Inf)      ->    vučem    (V+Present+1P+Sg)
#        ----------------------> vuk-em ----^

define Palatalization k -> č, g -> [d ž], h -> š || _ "^" e;

################################################################
# Sibilantization
# Velar -> Dental
# Examples:
#   - ruka  `arm`     (N+Nom+Sg)   ->    ruci   (N+Dat+Sg)

define Sibilantization k -> c, g -> z, h -> s || _ "^" i;

################################################################
# Iotation
# 
# Examples:
# Happens in:
#   - Comparative adjectives
#   - Verbs in present tense
#   - Adverbs
#   - Verb in imperfect tense
#   - Feminine nouns in instrumental case

define Iotation [z "^" j] -> ž       ,, 
                [s "^" j] -> š       ,,
                [d "^" j] -> đ       ,, 
                [t "^" j] -> ć       ,, 
                [b "^" j] -> [b l j] ,, 
                [p "^" j] -> [p l j] ,,
                [v "^" j] -> [v l j] ;

################################################################
# Fleeting A

define FleetingA a -> 0 || Consonant _ Consonant "^";

################################################################
# L to O
# L-vocalization: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/L-vocalization#South_Slavic_languages

define LVocalization l -> o || _ "^" .#. ;

################################################################
define Cleanup "^" -> 0 ;

################################################################
read lexc serbian.lexc
define Lexicon;

regex Lexicon .o. FleetingA .o. Iotation .o. LVocalization .o. Cleanup ;
